Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2010
Grocery or shopping bags; requirements.

On and after January 1, 1992, a person shall not sell or offer for sale at retail any bag used for or intended to be used for groceries or shopping which is constructed of a material which is not biodegradable, photodegradable, or recyclable.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 10.